California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) If the project involves a ground disturbing activity, the recipient has completed wildlife habitat and soil surveys and has prepared a wildlife habitat protection program to sustain a viable species composition for the project area.

(b) If the project involves a ground disturbing activity, the recipient agrees to monitor the condition of soils and wildlife in the project area each year in order to determine whether the soil conservation standards adopted pursuant to Section 5090.35 and the wildlife habitat protection program prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) are being met.

(c) If the project involves a ground disturbing activity, the recipient agrees that, whenever the soil conservation standards adopted pursuant to Section 5090.35 are not being met in any portion of a project area, the recipient shall close temporarily that noncompliant portion, to repair and prevent accelerated erosion, until the same soil conservation standards adopted pursuant to Section 5090.35 are met.

(d) If the project involves a ground disturbing activity, the recipient agrees that, whenever the wildlife habitat protection program prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) is not being met in any portion of a project area, the recipient shall close temporarily that noncompliant portion until the same wildlife habitat protection program prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) is met.

(e) The recipient agrees to enforce the registration of off-highway motor vehicles and the other provisions of Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code and to enforce the other applicable laws regarding the operation of off-highway motor vehicles.

(f) The recipient agrees to cooperate with appropriate law enforcement entities to provide proper law enforcement at and around the facility.

(g) The recipient has identified the potential for the facility to reduce illegal and unauthorized off-highway motor vehicle recreation activities in the surrounding areas.

(h) The recipient has included in its application a description of how it is meeting the operations and maintenance needs of any existing off-highway motor vehicle recreation facility under its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 541, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fiscal Management [5090.60. - 5090.65.]

5090.60.

The fund consists of deposits from the following sources:

(a) Revenues transferred from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(b) Fees paid pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 38225 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) Unexpended service fees.

(d) Fees and other proceeds collected at state vehicular recreation areas, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 5010.

(e) Reimbursements.

(f) Revenues and income from any other source required by law to be deposited in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.61.

Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as follows:

(a) An amount, not to exceed 50 percent of the annual revenues to the fund, shall be available for grants and cooperative agreements pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5090.50).

(b) (1) The remainder of the annual revenues to the fund shall be available for the support of the division in implementing the off-highway motor vehicle recreation program and for the planning, acquisition, development, mitigation, construction, maintenance, administration, operation, restoration, and conservation of
 lands in the system.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “support of the division” includes functions performed outside of the division by others on behalf of the division, including a prorated share of the department’s common overhead and other costs incurred on behalf of the division for personnel management and training, accounting, and fiscal analysis, records, purchasing, public information activities, consultation of professional scientists and reclamation experts for the purposes of Section 5090.35, and legal services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 459, Sec. 16.   (SB 249)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.65.

Money in the fund shall be used to pay for the repair of any boundary fence that segregates off-highway vehicle use from adjoining landowners and is adjacent to an off-highway vehicle site that is funded by the fund, when the fence has become broken or damaged by off-highway vehicle users.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5090.47 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.26. Outdoor Equity Grants Program [5090.75. - 5090.78.]

5090.75.

(a) The director shall establish the Outdoor Equity Grants Program to increase the ability of underserved and at-risk populations to participate in outdoor environmental educational experiences at state parks and other public lands where outdoor environmental education programs take place. The grant program shall award grants to public organizations, including local governments and local educational agencies, joint powers authorities, open-space authorities,
 regional open-space districts, other relevant public agencies, or nonprofit organizations, with a focus on funding transportation, logistical, and program operations and capacity costs associated with reaching historically underserved communities.

(b) In developing the grant program, the director shall do both of the following:

(1) Develop criteria, procedures, and accountability measures as may be necessary to implement the grant program.

(2) Administer the
 grant program to ensure that priority is given to underserved populations, including both urban and rural areas and low-income communities, where participation in outdoor environmental education and recreation programs has been limited.

(c) The director shall give priority for funding to outdoor environmental education programs that primarily provide outreach to and serve pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals, foster youth, or pupils of limited English proficiency, as these terms are defined in Section 42238.01 of the Education Code, and have one or more of the following attributes:

(1) Have a curriculum that is aligned to the content standards for California public schools adopted by the State Board of Education, including, but not limited to, the Next Generation Science standards, or the California History-Social Science standards.

(2) Foster stewardship of the environment and include, when available, curriculum established pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34.

(3) Integrate instruction in science, technology, engineering, arts, and mathematics.

(d) The director may give additional consideration to outdoor environmental education
 programs that do any of the following:

(1) Maximize the number of participants that can be served.

(2) Demonstrate partnerships between public, private, and nonprofit entities.

(3) Contribute to healthy lifestyles, sound nutritional habits, and improved outdoor educational and recreational experiences.

(4) Include service learning and community outreach components for purposes of building partnerships between participants and local communities.

(e) The director may provide funding for professional learning, based on approved content standards, for the staff and volunteers of those programs given priority pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) In implementing the grant program, the department
 shall work with relevant stakeholders to promote and implement the grant program in a manner that effectively reaches a wide geography throughout the state and ensures that regions in northern, central, and southern California, including both urban and rural areas, are adequately considered with an emphasis on addressing the transportation needs within these regions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.76.

(a) Except as authorized by the Legislature, the department shall not allocate for the purposes of the grant program any general fund moneys appropriated by the Legislature to the department in the annual Budget Act.

(b) The director may accept private donations made for the support of the grant program. The director may solicit and accept private funding to help offset the costs of the grant
 program.

(c) All moneys received pursuant to this section or appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of the grant program shall be deposited in the California Outdoor Equity Account, which is hereby created within the State Parks and Recreation Fund.

(d) Before commencing any program development activities for the
 grant program, adequate donations or funds shall be deposited into the California Outdoor Equity Account. This amount shall be sufficient to administer the grant program and provide grant awards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.77.

(a) The department shall gather information from applicants following each award year for purposes of evaluating the effectiveness of outdoor environmental education programs in achieving the objectives of the grant program. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall annually summarize and report this information for the previous award year to the appropriate budget and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The information in the annual report shall include the total number of children served, the total number and types of entities that received grant awards, appropriate recommendations to improve the grant program, partnerships formed, educational objectives achieved, the total number of
 applications received, and the total number of children who would have been served had all applicants for the award year received grant awards.

(b) A report required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.78.

The department shall adopt guidelines it determines as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the adoption of guidelines pursuant to this section. The department shall develop a process for public comment and review of the guidelines that involves three public hearings in three different parts of the state before the adoption of those guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.27. California Sno-Park Permit Program [5091.01. - 5091.27.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5091.01. - 5091.02.]

5091.01.

(a) The Legislature finds that as the popularity of winter recreation has steadily grown, so too has the problem of insufficient parking areas for participants.

(b) The Legislature hereby declares that adequate parking facilities for winter recreation are essential to ensure safety and well-being of the states’ winter recreationists.

(c) Accordingly, in furtherance of the California Outdoor Recreation Plan, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish the California SNO-PARK Permit Program, whereby winter recreationists may purchase a windshield sticker that will allow them to park in any of the roadside parking areas to be established and plowed for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1560, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5091.02.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Authorized vendor” means a retail commercial enterprise, authorized by the department to sell SNO-PARK permits established by this chapter.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) “Fund” means the Winter Recreation Fund.

(d) “Designated parking area” means an area located, constructed, maintained, and signed pursuant to this chapter.

(e) “Winter recreation” means any recreational activity principally dependent upon snow-covered ground, including, but not limited to, cross-country skiing, snowshoeing, sledding, ice fishing, snow camping, dogsledding, and snowmobiling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1560, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Designation of Parking Areas [5091.10. - 5091.10.]

5091.10.

(a) The State Park and Recreation Commission shall hold at least two public hearings, one in the northern portion of the state and one in the southern portion of the state, to seek proposals from individuals, winter recreation user groups, the department, and other public agencies for parking areas to be designated under this chapter.

(b) The director shall appoint a committee, which shall be known as the “Winter Recreation Committee,” to advise the director on the location of designated parking areas.

(c) The department shall, after consultation with the State Park and Recreation Commission, the Department of Transportation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the appropriate boards of supervisors, and any local public or private persons owning lands adjacent to each site, designate winter recreation parking locations throughout the state and include the sites as an element of the California outdoor recreation plan. The department may enter into long-range agreements for the utilization of private and public lands for the programs. The location and design of any proposed site adjacent to, or directly impacting on, a state highway shall be reviewed and approved by the Department of Transportation. The location and design of any proposed site adjacent to, or directly impacting on, a county road shall be reviewed and approved by the appropriate board of supervisors.

(d) Using funds appropriated from the Winter Recreation Fund and allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5091.25, the Department of Transportation shall provide for the removal of snow accumulating on designated parking areas according to priorities established by the Department of Transportation in consultation with the department. The removal of snow from the roadway of state highways shall always take precedence over the removal of snow from designated parking areas.

(e) Using funds appropriated from the Winter Recreation Fund and allocated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5091.25, the department may make grants to counties for the removal of snow accumulating on designated parking areas. The department may contract with the appropriate public and private entities for snow removal, provision of sanitary facilities, signage, trash removal, parking lot repairs, and other services. In no event shall the removal of snow on designated parking areas become a county responsibility, except by agreement with the appropriate board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 278, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. SNO-PARK Permit Program [5091.15. - 5091.15.]

5091.15.

(a) Except as provided in this section, no person shall, from November 1 of any year to May 30 of the next year or for a shorter time as determined by the department, park a vehicle in a designated parking area unless the vehicle displays a parking permit issued by the department. Overnight camping in a vehicle parked in a designated parking area may be authorized by the department when it determines that the use is for a recreational activity, is safe and prudent, and is of limited duration.

(b) No parking permit shall be required under this section for a vehicle owned and operated by the United States, another state or political subdivision thereof, or by this state or by a city, county, district, or political subdivision thereof.

(c) The fee for the issuance of a parking permit under this chapter shall be determined by the department. The department shall hold at least one public hearing and notify the Legislature at least 30 days prior to any proposal to change the fees.

(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars ($75). Unless the peace officer issuing the citation witnesses the parking of the vehicle, a rebuttable presumption exists that a vehicle parked in violation of this section was parked by the registered owner of the vehicle. If the parking of the vehicle is witnessed by the peace officer, the operator of the vehicle is in violation of this section.

(e) The department may negotiate reciprocity agreements with other states having similar programs if the agreements are in the best interests of the California SNO-PARK program.

(f) The department may contract with appropriate agencies for law enforcement, including, but not limited to, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the county sheriffs, and the United States Department of Agriculture Forest Service. Enforcement activities may be funded with moneys appropriated from the Winter Recreation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 541, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Permits [5091.20. - 5091.20.]

5091.20.

(a) The department shall print the permits required by this chapter and shall supervise the sale of the permits throughout the state.

(b) The department shall either distribute and sell the permits directly or contract with vendors according to rules and regulations adopted by the department. The authorized vendors shall be bonded in accordance with the rules and regulations and shall receive a stipulated commission for each permit sold.

(c) In situations where the department elects to contract with a vendor pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall provide the permits to the vendor at no cost. The vendor may deduct his or her commission from the proceeds acquired from permit sales prior to remitting those proceeds to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revenues [5091.25. - 5091.27.]

5091.25.

(a) Proceeds from the sale of SNO-PARK parking permits shall be paid to the State Treasury to the credit of the Winter Recreation Fund, which is hereby created.

(b) The moneys in the Winter Recreation Fund shall be allocated, when appropriated, as follows:

(1) An amount equal to the actual and necessary costs incurred in the removal of snow from designated parking areas shall be paid to the Department of Transportation.

(2) The balance of the funds shall be expended for the acquisition, lease, development, and maintenance of additional designated parking areas, for sanitation facilities, trailhead markings, and other facilities designed to promote the safety and well-being of persons engaged in winter recreation, and for grants to counties for the actual and necessary costs incurred in the removal of snow from designated parking areas, and to inform and educate the public about the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 541, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5091.26.

Eminent domain shall not be exercised to acquire any interest in property for a designated parking area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1560, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5091.27.

The department may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1560, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.3. California Wilderness Preservation System [5093.30. - 5093.40.]

5093.30.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Wilderness Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.31.

In order to assure that an increasing population, accompanied by expanding settlement and growing mechanization, does not occupy and modify all areas on state-owned lands within California, leaving no areas designated for preservation and protection in their natural condition, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of California to secure for present and future generations the benefits of an enduring resource of wilderness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.32.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Minimum management requirements” means the minimum wilderness management actions that are necessary to administer a wilderness area for the purpose of this chapter.

(b) “Minimum tool” means the least intrusive tool, equipment, device, regulation, action, or practice that will achieve the minimum management requirements.

(c) “Roadless area” means a reasonably compact area of undeveloped land that possesses the general characteristics of a wilderness, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 5093.33, and within which there is no improved road that is suitable for public travel by motorized vehicles intended primarily for highway use.

(d) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(e) “System” means the California wilderness preservation system.

(f) “Wilderness areas” means component areas of the system as described in Section 5093.33, 5093.34, or 5093.345.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.33.

(a) There is hereby established a California wilderness preservation system to be composed of state-owned areas designated by the Legislature as “wilderness areas” and units of the state park system classified as “state wildernesses” by the State Park and Recreation Commission pursuant to Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 5019.50) of Chapter 1, and these shall be administered for the use and enjoyment of the people in such manner as will leave them unimpaired for future use and enjoyment as wilderness, provide for the protection of such areas, preserve their wilderness character, and provide for the gathering and dissemination of information regarding their use and enjoyment as wilderness. No state-owned areas shall be designated as “wilderness areas” except as provided for in this chapter or by subsequent legislative enactment.

(b) Notwithstanding the inclusion of an area within the system, a wilderness area shall continue to be subject to the jurisdiction of the state agency or agencies having jurisdiction thereover immediately prior to its inclusion in the system. The secretary shall adopt guidelines for the management of wilderness areas. Each state agency or agencies having jurisdiction over a wilderness area shall adopt regulations for the management of such areas consistent with the guidelines adopted by the secretary and the objectives of this chapter. Such regulations shall include provisions to protect endangered or rare native plant and animal species.

(c) A wilderness area, in contrast to those areas where man and his own works dominate the landscape, is hereby recognized as an area where the earth and its community of life are untrammeled by man, where man himself is a visitor who does not remain. A wilderness area is further defined to mean an area of relatively undeveloped state-owned land which has retained its primeval character and influence or has been substantially restored to a near natural appearance, without permanent improvements or human habitation, other than semi-improved campgrounds and primitive latrines, and which is protected and managed so as to preserve its natural conditions and which:

(1) Appears generally to have been affected primarily by the forces of nature, with the imprint of man’s work substantially unnoticeable.

(2) Has outstanding opportunities for solitude or a primitive and unconfined type of recreation.

(3) Has at least 5,000 acres of land, either by itself or in combination with contiguous areas possessing wilderness characteristics, or is of sufficient size as to make practicable its preservation and use in an unimpaired condition.

(4) May also contain ecological, geological, or other features of scientific, educational, scenic, or historical value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 275.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.34.

(a) The following areas are hereby designated as components of the system:

(1) Santa Rosa Mountains State Wilderness, consisting of that portion of Anza-Borrego Desert State Park in San Diego County within the area encompassed by Townships 9 and 10 South and Ranges 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 East, San Bernardino Base and Meridian, except that the State Park and Recreation Commission shall establish the precise boundary.

(2) Mount San Jacinto State Wilderness in Mount San Jacinto State Park in Riverside County consisting of approximately 9,800 acres and including all of Sections 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, and 31, Township 4 South, Range 3 East, and all of Section 6, Township 5 South, Range 3 East, except the SW 14 NW 14, NW 14 SW 14, NE 14 SW 14, SW 14 SW 14, and SE 14 SE 14, San Bernardino Base and Meridian.

(3) The land in the Sinkyone Wilderness State Park after the exchanges of land provided for in Section 6 of the act amending this section at the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature, effective upon approval of a general plan for the area by the State Park and Recreation Commission, as required by Section 5002.45.

(b) The following state school lands, currently under the jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission, shall become components of the system on January 1, 1977, unless exchanged with the federal government for other lands pursuant to existing law prior to that date:

(1) Approximately 640 acres in Monterey County within the Ventana Wilderness, consisting of Section 16, Township 19 South, Range 2 East, Mount Diablo Base and Meridian.

(2) Approximately 40 acres in Monterey County within the Ventana Wilderness, consisting of the NE 14 NE 14 of Section 36, Township 19 South, Range 3 East, Mount Diablo Base and Meridian.

(3) Approximately 80 acres in Monterey County within the Ventana Wilderness, consisting of the SE 14 NW 14 and the SW 14 NE 14 of Section 36, Township 19 South, Range 2 East, Mount Diablo Base and Meridian.

(4) Approximately 40 acres in Santa Barbara County within the San Rafael Wilderness, consisting of the SE 14 NW 14 of Section 16, Township 7 North, Range 27 West, San Bernardino Base and Meridian.

(5) Approximately 80 acres in Siskiyou County within the Marble Mountain Wilderness, consisting of the E 12 and the NW 14 of Section 16, Township 41 North, Range 12 West, Mount Diablo Base and Meridian.

(6) Approximately 640 acres in Tehama County within the Yolla Bolla Middle Eel Wilderness, consisting of Section 36, Township 27 North, Range 10 West, Mount Diablo Base and Meridian.

Nothing herein shall preclude the State Lands Commission from effecting exchanges of any such land described in subdivision (b) with the federal government on or after January 1, 1977, for the purpose of including the exchanged land in the national wilderness preservation system. Upon completion of any such exchange, any such land described in subdivision (b) shall no longer be part of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1234, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.345.

(a) Limekiln State Wilderness, comprised of approximately 413 acres of Limekiln State Park as generally depicted on a map entitled “Limekiln State Park Wilderness” dated August 29, 2008, and filed with the Secretary of State and transmitted to the secretary, is hereby designated as a component of the system. The department may take measures to control fire, diseases, and insects as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 5093.36.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the California Coastal Trail, as specified in Section 31408, may be located, designed, constructed, or operated within the Limekiln State Wilderness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 689, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.35.

(a) The secretary, in cooperation with each department within the Resources Agency, shall review state-owned roadless areas under his or her jurisdiction as of January 1, 1975, including, but not limited to, lands within the state park system, state forests, and fish and game refuges, reserves, sanctuaries, and other areas designated for the protection of wildlife, but not including tide and submerged lands lying below the mean high tide line, and shall report to the Legislature his or her recommendations as to the suitability or nonsuitability of each area for preservation as state wilderness.

(b) The State Lands Commission shall review state-owned roadless areas under its jurisdiction that have been identified as possessing significant environmental values pursuant to Section 6370.2, and shall report to the Legislature its recommendations as to the suitability or nonsuitability of each area for preservation as wilderness.

(c) Additional reviews and reports as to suitability or nonsuitability for preservation as wilderness shall be made by the secretary and the State Lands Commission for the following areas:

(1) State-owned roadless areas under their respective jurisdictions and within or contiguous to federal wilderness areas designated by the Congress after January 1, 1975, within one year after the designation.

(2) State-owned roadless areas under their respective jurisdictions that are acquired after January 1, 1975, within three years of the acquisition.

(d) The secretary and the State Lands Commission, prior to submitting recommendations with respect to the suitability of an area for preservation as a wilderness area, shall:

(1) Give public notice of the proposed action as deemed appropriate, including publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each county within which the affected area is located, and mailed to every person who has filed a request for notice of hearing. If the notice of hearing is published in a weekly newspaper, it must appear therein on at least two different days of publication, and, if in a newspaper published more often, there must be at least five days from the first to the last day of publication, both days included. The content of the notice of hearing shall substantially comply with the requirements of Section 11346.5 of the Government Code.

(2) Hold a public hearing or hearings in the City of San Diego, City of Los Angeles, City and County of San Francisco, or City of Sacramento, whichever is closest to the area affected, not less than 30 days, nor more than 60 days, after the last date of publication of the notice. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner specified in Section 11346.8 of the Government Code.

(3) Advise, at least 30 days before the date of a hearing, the board of supervisors of each county where the lands are located, and federal, state, and local agencies concerned, and invite those officials and agencies to submit their views on the proposed action at the hearing or within a specified period thereafter.

(e) A view submitted under the provisions of subdivision (d) with respect to an area shall be included with recommendations to the Legislature with respect to that area.

(f) A modification or adjustment of boundaries of a wilderness area designated by the Legislature shall be recommended to the Legislature by the secretary or the State Lands Commission after public notice of the proposal and public hearing or hearings as provided in subdivision (d).

(g) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to lessen the present statutory authority of a state agency with respect to the maintenance of roadless areas.

(h) Privately owned areas within or contiguous to state-owned areas shall not preclude the review of the state-owned areas as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.36.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a state agency with jurisdiction over an area designated as a wilderness area shall be responsible for preserving the wilderness character of the wilderness area and shall administer the area for the purposes for which it has been established and to preserve its wilderness character. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, wilderness areas shall be devoted to the public purposes of recreational, scenic, scientific, educational, conservation, and historical use.

(b) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, and subject to private rights existing as of January 1, 1975, there shall be no commercial enterprise and no permanent road within any wilderness area. There shall be no temporary road, no use of motor vehicles, motorized equipment, or motorboats, no landing or hovering of aircraft, no flying of aircraft lower than 2,000 feet above the ground, no other form of mechanical transport, and no structure or installation within any wilderness area, except under either of the following circumstances:

(1) It is necessary in an emergency involving the health and safety of persons within the wilderness area.

(2) It is the minimum tool necessary to meet the minimum management requirements.

(c) The following special provisions are hereby made:

(1) Within a wilderness area, measures may be taken as may be necessary for the control of fire, insects, and diseases, subject to conditions that the state agency with jurisdiction over the wilderness area may deem desirable.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any activity by any public agency within a wilderness area, including prospecting, for the purpose of gathering information about mineral or other resources that the state agency with jurisdiction over the wilderness area has determined will be carried on in a manner compatible with the preservation of the wilderness environment.

(3) A state agency with jurisdiction over a wilderness area may authorize the collection of hydrometeorological data and the conduct of weather modification activities, including both atmospheric and surface activities and environmental research, which are within, over, or may affect wilderness areas and for those purposes may permit access, installation, and use of equipment which is specifically justified and unobtrusively located. Maximum practical application of miniaturization, telemetry, and camouflage shall be employed in conducting weather modification activities. In granting permission for the conduct of data collection and weather modification activities, the appropriate state agency may prescribe operating and monitoring conditions that it deems necessary to minimize or avoid long-term and intensive local impact on the wilderness character of the wilderness areas affected.

(4) Within a wilderness area, the grazing of livestock, where established prior to January 1, 1975, may be permitted to be continued by the present lessee or permittee subject to limitation by the terms and regulations that are deemed necessary by the state agency with jurisdiction over the wilderness areas.

(5) This chapter does not apply to the aerial stocking of fish or to the conduct of aerial surveys of wildlife species.

(6) A state agency with jurisdiction over a wilderness area may authorize measures that address environmental damage or degradation affecting wilderness character and resources if those measures are consistent with the minimum management requirements and only the minimum tools are used.

(7) Guidelines for the determination of the minimum management requirements and the minimum tool shall be adopted by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 689, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.37.

(a) In any case where privately owned land is completely surrounded by wilderness areas, the private owner may acquire from the state a reasonable means of ingress and egress across wilderness areas from highways and roads to such land and from such land to highways and roads.

(b) Application from such a private owner for ingress and egress shall be made to the administering state agency. When application for ingress and egress is received, the administering state agency shall determine whether any reasonable access exists outside the boundaries of the wilderness area or could be economically constructed.

(c) Where reasonable access does not exist or cannot be economically constructed outside the boundaries of the wilderness area, the administering state agency shall grant a permit for right-of-way across the wilderness area over such route, and subject to such conditions and construction and maintenance specifications, as the administering state agency may determine will cause minimum alteration to the physical features of the wilderness area and minimum interference with the use of the wilderness area by the public.

(d) The permittee shall, at his own expense, construct and maintain the means of ingress and egress in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the permit, noncompliance with which in any part shall be due cause for revocation of the permit.

(e) The administering state agency may require a permittee to allow the use of such means of ingress and egress by other applicants whose lands are similarly situated. The administering state agency shall grant a permit for such use under terms and conditions imposed upon existing users, upon payment of a reasonable compensation for construction and maintenance of the road, by the applicant to the existing permittee.

(f) Subject to the appropriation of funds by the Legislature, the state agency or agencies having jurisdiction over such wilderness areas may acquire privately owned land within the perimeter of any area designated by this chapter as a wilderness area.

(g) The state agency or agencies having jurisdiction over such wilderness areas may accept gifts or bequests of land within or contiguous to wilderness areas. Regulations with regard to any such land may be in accordance with such agreements, consistent with the policy of this chapter, as are made at the time of such gift, or such conditions, consistent with such policy, as may be included in, and accepted with, such bequest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.38.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the jurisdiction or responsibility of the state with regard to fish and wildlife. Hunting and fishing may be permitted on lands and waters administered as parts of the system under applicable state or federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.39.

The secretary shall, no later than December 1, 1975, and on or before December 1st of each year thereafter, report to the Governor and to the Legislature on the status of the system, including a list and descriptions of the wilderness areas within the system, guidelines and regulations in effect, and recommendations for additions to the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)